Illinois, session 104th, HB1593.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Homeowners' Little Free Library Act. 6    Section 5. Definitions. As used in this Act unless the 7context otherwise requires:8    "Association" has the meaning set forth in subsection (o) 9of Section 2 of the Condominium Property Act or Section 1-5 of 10the Common Interest Community Association Act, as applicable.11    "Little free library" means a small structure on a 12resident's property designed, advertised, and used for 13depositing and withdrawing books by the public. 14    Section 10. No prohibition on little free libraries. 15    (a) An association shall not prohibit any resident or 16owner from operating a little free library on the resident's 17or owner's property so long as the little free library is 18maintained, does not extend over or onto neighboring 19properties, public or common sidewalks, pathways, streets or 20other public or common areas or elements, and does not 21interfere with traffic or utilities.22    (b) An association may adopt reasonable rules and   HB1593- 2 -LRB104 06863 RTM 16899 b1regulations governing a little free library that do not impair 2a little free library's maintenance and care or impose height 3restrictions.4    (c) This Section shall not apply to common areas or 5elements or to other property owned by the association or 6other owners in which the resident or owner does not have 7authority establish a little free library. 8    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 9becoming law.